Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-135
Public records.

The secretary shall keep for public examination a record of all marks registered or renewed under the Trademark Registration Act, as well as a record of all documents recorded pursuant to section 87-134.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 10.